Tennessee, session 114, SB0454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-101-501(b)(15), is amended by
deleting the comma immediately after the language "for a charitable organization" in the first
sentence of the subdivision.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-101-501(b)(15), is amended by
deleting the language ", or a person who plans, conducts, manages, carries on or advises a
charitable organization in connection with the solicitation of contributions".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0454
000678
- 1 -